Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-42] Educational, medical, dental,
and recreational needs. Upon the first day of placement, a child's
resource family shall have the authority, for the child placed in the resource
family's care:

(1) To consent to routine educational and recreational
needs and activities, except for purposes regulated under title 8, chapters 60
and 61, of the Hawaii administrative rules, or successor rules; and

(2) To seek and obtain ordinary medical and dental
care, immunizations, and well-baby and well-child medical services. [L 2010, c
135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next